Z. Surface Gauge, for indicating items parallel to base of machine.
Zsuzsanna Izsvak and Zoltan Ivics concur: 'This transposon technology may greatly simplify the way gene therapy is conducted, improve its overall safety and reduce the costs'.
ZSW1 type intelligent conventional circuit breaker is introduced, including its structure, main performance and applications.
ZSX series aerovane screen is the most popular choiceness equipment at present. It use for screen out thick liquid of material group and other fibre and impurity.
ZSY is a hi - tech corporation in ZhongGuanCun Science and Technology Park.
ZT 12 - 00  aquapulper  is made up of plug rotor, trough, heating enclosing, temperature controller , framework, etc.
ZT-3 rotor test bed in Department of Mechanical Engineering in Southeast University is a DC motor centered open-loop control system, which speed is controlled by regulating the regulator manually.
ZT—400? model stripping headers was better than traditional type and it was longer in cutting breadth, higher efficiency, more convenient and economy.
ZT acceptance: quality first, service first, credit standing first to offer the products.
ZT added in the culture has greatly promoted the plumule.
Ztai services team is a professional and innovative team, each member has a wealth of public relations experience.
ZT-B series welding type vacuum flow regulating valve fulfills the flow adjustment purpose by changing the size of the pipeline inner sectional area.
ZTD can decrease the vaginal bleeding volume and shorten the bleeding time and tends to increase the complete abortion rate.
ZT:Do u have any advice to the young designers?
ZTE, a leading provider of comprehensive communication solution, has ranked among the first three in PCT international patent applications for 6 years successively, and ranked first in 2011 and 2012.
ZTE also has been eyeing U.S. markets.
ZTE also sets its headquarter in Shenzhen. Over the past few years, it keeps in step with Huawei and realizes fast growth with the similar strategy in almost the same market.
ZTE and Huawei, both based in the southern city of Shenzhen, said they were talking to the Beijing Olympic Committee about various kinds of co-operation.
ZTE and Huawei took the lion's share of orders from China Mobile, China Unicom and China Telecom for those networks.
ZTE began courting European carriers several years ago by supplying customised handsets.
ZTE Beijing Tiancheng Department of and Electrical Equipment Co. private - owned enterprises.
ZTE car distributor MP3/MP4 Hunan, Tianjin day-to-long series of management software distributor in Hunan.
ZTE, China's largest publicly listed telecommunications equipment company, is making moves to step into auto 1 manufacturing.
ZTE, China's second-biggest maker of telephone equipment, rose 4.2 percent to a record HK$37.45 in Hong Kong, while the stock climbed 0.6 percent to 69.30 yuan in Shenzhen trading.
ZTE commits around 10% of annual turnover to research and development and takes a leading role in a wide range of international bodies developing emerging telecoms standards.
ZTE commits around 10% of its annual turnover to research and development and takes a leading role in a wide range of international bodies developing emerging telecoms standards.
ZTE Corp. , a Huawei rival also based in Shenzhen, sells switching equipment, mobile phone base stations and handsets.
ZTE Corp., a Huawei rival also based in Shenzhen, sells switching equipment, mobile phone base stations and handsets.
ZTE Corp. announced that China Telecom, the largest telecom carrier in China, achieved an industry breakthrough by deploying ZTE’s Ethernet Passive Optical Networks (EPON) Solution.
ZTE Corp is the world's fourth largest mobile phone manufacturer, with 90,000 employees worldwide.
ZTE Corporation rolls out 10GE products to meet the requirements of Chinese data communications market.
ZTE Corp, whose market share at the end of 2009 reached 12.6%, claimed it has overtaken Alcatel-Lucent in the global wireless equipment market for the year 2009.
ZTE-D has invested in Distance learning equipments and funded major culture promotion events.
ZTEÈó·áFood Co. , Ltd. is a growing, processing, import and export trade for an integrated international-oriented enterprises.
ZTE filed a lawsuit in China in April saying Huawei infringed on its fourth generation technology.
ZTE focuses on making equipment that is cheap, reliable and unobtrusive .
ZTE has also enjoyed growth in its sale of mobiledevices, although in recent months it has faced allegations about banned salesof U. S. -sanctioned computer equipment to Iran.
ZTE Has Developed a Complete Data Product Line
ZTE has filed a patent infringement lawsuit against Ericsson's China unit after the Swedish telecoms giant filed patent lawsuits against ZTE in Britain, Italy and Germany.
ZTE has filed a patent infringement lawsuit against Ericsson's China unit after the Swedish telecoms giant filed patent lawsuits against ZTE in Britain, Italy and
ZTE has set up 15 research and development institutes in China, USA, Sweden, India, Pakistan and France.
ZTE has won the last three bidding for Unicom's CDMA network, and they currently owns 20% of the domestic market share for CDMA equipments;
ZTE Hotels Group provides each employee a reasonable, competitive salary system, as well as good training, benefits, insurance mechanisms.
ZTE, Huawei's smaller Chinese peer, also sought and failed to win a piece of the Sprint contract last year.
ZTE in 1990 thanks to the Lord Dachengquan Mr. Wang Xuanjie for the division.
ZTE is a leading global provider of telecommunications equipment and network solutions.
ZTE is also at full capacity before the line.
ZTE is always willing to negotiate on issues in good faith but will definitely take vigorous legal action in situations like this to protect its interests and those of its customers worldwide.
ZTE is a trojan horse, just like Huawei. this deal is part of the economic war against India.
ZTE is the largest listed communications equipment manufacturer, the largest local wireless suppliers in China and one of the key enterprises supported by Chinese government.
ZTE is the only Chinese company nominated for this global award.
ZTE last month said China Unicom (Hong Kong) Ltd. ordered 2 million units of its Blade smartphone, also known as the V880, after the mobile carrier sold a batch of 1 million units ordered in June.
ZTE launched the world"s first commercial SDR base station at the 2008 GSMA Mobile World Congress in Barcelona."
ZTE leads the warrant to subscribe for an increase of 6.9 % Kangmei Pharmaceutical warrants were up 6.7% in hot pursuit Subsequently, they were larger than the date of the underlying shares increases.
ZTE mobile phone equipment and systems will go hand in hand.
ZTE Picture Frame Craft Factory, Jiangmen City, Guangdong Province is located in Jiangmen City Xinhui District, "the hometown of overseas Chinese."
ZTE provides us a successful case among the reform of SOE, and it is necessary to abstract the successful experiences of ZTE' reform.
ZTE ranked second, followed by Motorola, who surpassed LG to further cement its position in the CDMA market.
ZTE representative declined to give details, but denied a report that ZTE and Intel have already jointly developed a new phone.
ZTE said at the time the letter was a mischaracterization of the company and Huawei said it has no current ties to the Chinese government or military.
ZTE said in March global smartphone sales would likely rise to 12 million units from just 3 million in 2010, partly driven by the launch of lower-priced handsets.
ZTE said it had been told by carriers that certain companies including itself had not qualified in India's security tests.
ZTE said the object had been paid incentive stock option shall subject.
ZTE says it is willing to work with operators, but is also preparing to push its own brand more vigorously, particularly in western Europe.
ZTE’s bosses, he says, held little sway with the central government.
ZTE's bosses, he says, held little sway with the central government.
ZTE's cheapest non-solar phone costs US$25.
ZTE's diversified products like WCDMA, CDMA, NGN, GSM, switching, access, and optical transmission have entered over 60 countries and regions.
ZTE’s EPON Solution helped Shanghai Telecom to address transmission problem between its backend machine rooms and CDMA base stations located in remote facility.
ZTE shares have lost 26 percent so far this year, while Lenovo shares were down about a quarter since this year's high hit in late April.
ZTE's most top-level swimming pool is located, open-air design (glass ceiling), there is the seaside resort-like feel.
ZTE's Multi - Service access equipment has been widely applied around the world with 38 million lines in total.
ZTE's Multi-Service access equipment has been widely applied around the world with38 million lines in total.
ZTE's product range is the most complete in the world, covering virtually every sector of the wireline, wireless, terminal and service markets.
ZTE's products and solutions include wireless networks, core networks, access & bearer networks, services and terminals , etc.
ZTE"s SDR technology enables mobile operators to extend the lifespan of network systems and integrate multiple applications."
ZTE's soft switch products have been commercially deployed in every operator network in China as well as internationally in countries like Russia, India, Colombia, Hungary, Mongolia, Philippines, and Pakistan.
Z test is used to analyse the data colleted in the experiment.
Z test method, a new method for identifying an outlier, has been proposed in this paper.
ZTE's  ZXA  10 access product has obtained 9 essential patents and 295 invention patents.
ZTE's ZXA10 access product has obtained9 essential patents and295 invention patents.
ZTE was open to widening the alliance with Alcatel in the future and could announce other new partnership deals related to other products over the next year, Mr Lin said.
ZTE was the second highest filer of international patent applications in the world last year according to the World Intellectual Property Organization, making 1, 863 different filings.
ZTE was the second highest filer of international patent applications in the world last year according to the World Intellectual Property Organization, making 1,863 different filings.
ZTFB photosensitive seal layer edge bonding machine is a special machine, which uses bonding die cavity to electric perm and spin to avoid ink infiltrate.
ZTF Compressed Air Filters are used in air system piping and at the point-of-use to protect compressed air drying equipment and process machinery and enhance performance.
ZThad slight effect on the ureide content.
z That constant, again, does not depend on y, but it can still depend on z because we still have not said anything about partial with respect to z.
z Then, a2, that's partial w partial y, and a3, partial w partial z.
Z: Then let us sit down and have a good talk about it.
z The problem is sometimes you cannot actually solve for x, y, z in here because this condition is too complicated and then we need a new method. That is what we are going to do.
Z : There is another standard for measuring a city. You can find a lot of foreign ballad-singers in subways of advanced countries such as Japan, France and Russia.
z This one is actually more general because you don't need to solve for z, z but if you cannot solve for z then it is the same as before.
Z-Time [Zebra time=GMT ]
ZTJ series of Screw Propeller are used as cycle stirring devices for lying pulp and paper making industry to keep fiber in suspension and also well-distributed.
ZTJ Urban & Architecture Design CO. , LTD. TianJin emphasizes the seamless connection between the plan and construction process, and to the perfect implementation of originality in a project.
ZT(l-25ppm)had slight effect on the ureide content.
ZTL, low poly . OBJ, and texture bakes are available for purchase separately.
Z:Today I'll introduce something about the history of banking in the west.
Z toggles between wireframe and solid display.
ZTo keep balance on the following issues in the future
Z to London let girlfriend give a chance to prove he was in love with her.
Z to relatively high accuracy.
Z to re - start mode network file copy.
Z to the relatively high accuracy, suitable for the workpiece is longer or the huge workpiece.
Z Trace this letter first, then color the matchable upper and lower case letters.
Z-transform is a mathematically powerful tool to operate descrete variable sequence.
Z-transform method is very simple and feasible to analyze DSP algorithms. The method can fast work out accurate numbers of delay, so designer can select feasible filter structure.
Z transform
ZTree: “The best file/directory manager out there.”
ZT series of rotating flat roof mainly consist of an annular rotating flat roof, a flat roof supporting system and 2 sets of driving facilities.
ZT SeriesUse and characteristic:Are composed by a driving frame and a driven frame, uses in supporting and the welding garden shape simplified form class work piece.
ZT Steal beat gun business entire proceeding the risk of death!
ZTU series of Turbine Propeller are used as cycle stirring devices for lying pulp chest in paper making industry to keep fiber in suspension and also well-distributed .
ZT:"We either make ourselves miserable, or we make ourselves strong. The amount of work is the same."
ZT: What's ur opinion about the new trend in design?
ZT : When answering to RFP, do you use components made by the community?
ZT: When answering to RFP, do you use components made by the community ?
ZT :why do you like to use many floral motifs in the design of bags?
ZTYS , Lead Internet Brand era in China!
Zubac says he wants to show he's a good player.
Zubaidi said.“Each piece was marked and recorded.
Zuba : I forgot about the rite of passage.
Zuba: I forgot about the rite of passage.
Zubair Motiwala, chairman of the Sindh Board of Investment, acknowledged the cancellation of plans to build a coal mine, power and chemical plants over 20 years.
Zubair says seeking money from the IMF will force Pakistan's government to adopt badly needed financial reforms that should lead to longer-term financial stability.
Zuba : It's a traditional coming - of - age ceremony. Young lions earn their manes by demonstrating their skills.
Zuba: It's a traditional coming-of-age ceremony. Young lions earn their manes by demonstrating their skills.
Zubari published an apology in Yediot on Tuesday.
Zubat: Sorry kiddo . We'll take that!
Zuba  : We will hold the rite of passage in the morning!
Zuba: We will hold the rite of passage in the morning!
Zuber and her colleagues also analyzed Mars' s much larger northern polar cap.
Zuber and her colleagues also analyzed Mars's much larger northern polar cap.
Zuber's results confirmed that the northern cap is composed entirely of water ice, in some areas interspersed with layers of windblown dust and sediment.
Zubin Mehta was born in Bombay and trained in Vienna.
Zubin was once chief of a tribe which fought against Duke Boragus. When peace was finally attained, he was offered his own command within the armies of Krewlod.
Zublin ballastless track
Zublin bit.
Zublin bit
zublin differential bit
Zublin differential bit
Zuboff, S. "Informate the Enterprise: an Agenda for the 21st Century. " National Forum (1991).
ZU: By the end of 2004, I had some songs with Lin Yue just for fun.
Zucchini and cucumber also grow quickly, but vegetables like cabbage take two months and lime can take up to two years.
Zucchi, Niccolo
Zucchini noodles make for fabulous lightened-up versions of your favorite pasta dishes.
Zucchini yellow mosaic virus
Zucco explained, "The benefit for the school is that the quality of our students has been made visible to the managers who attended the IACC event."
Zuccotti Park is relatively small, and there were nowhere near the thousands of protesters that seem to appear on the news.
Zuccotti's cancer had spread to her liver and a bone near her right eye socket.
ZuChengXun to belittle the Japanese, so-called can quickly retrieve Pyongyang.
Zuchong has accurately calculated the ratio of the circumference to seven points after the radix point.
Zu Chongzhi accurately calculated the value of pi to seven decimal places.
ZU Chongzhi's Contributions to Metrology Science
Zu chongzi family researches on and contribution to mathematics of astronomy calendar
"Zucht", in terms of German general pedagogy, is a basic concept, which stands in juxtaposition with student "administration" and "instruction".
Zuck, as he's known to most, lives in a modest house in Palo Alto and often walks to the office.
Zuckerberg, 24, is a hot ticket on the conference circuit, and when I spoke to him, he had just returned to Palo Alto, Calif., from a major tech-industry event near San Diego.
Zuckerberg added he can only hope that “people will remember us for what we build.”
Zuckerberg again was all about regret in February this year, when he revoked the changes Facebook made to its Terms of Service.
Zuckerberg allegedly entered into a verbal contract with the Winklevosses, promising to help build the site in return for equity.
Zuckerberg also addressed rumors ranging from the company's music ambitions to its profitability.
Zuckerberg also pointed out in his response to the Hangout question, that one-on-one video chat will be the more common use case (Google+ has "Hangout" which allows 10 users to video chat at once).
Zuckerberg also seemed to distance himself from Google, the undisputed leader in search, last month when Facebook announced a deal with Microsoft's Bing.
Zuckerberg always insisted that his employees create powerful analytics dashboards.
Zuckerberg and Chan have spent the past two years speaking to scientists and other experts to plan the endeavor.
Zuckerberg and Chan started seeing each other when they were both studying at Harvard University.
Zuckerberg and Chan will donate nearly all of their Facebook stock to the cause.
Zuckerberg and his longtime girlfriend, Priscilla, have been cooking what he slaughters, eating what many people would not dare consume.
Zuckerberg and others know, every day can write 1000 lines of code to the programmer, not only to write 50 lines than high 20 times.
ZUCKERBERG: (beat) If you say so.
Zuckerberg began his own enterprise at school because his future could not wait.
Zuckerberg cites “Minimalism,” “Revolutions,” and “Eliminating Desire” as interests.
Zuckerberg created the site with his Harvard room-mates in 2004 and it now has 500 million active users.
Zuckerberg decided, instead, to enter Harvard, in the fall of 2002.
Zuckerberg did say, however, that "this simpler type of messaging is going to be how people shift their communication."
Zuckerberg doesn't have that advantage.
Zuckerberg ended the session by giving Mr. Obama a hoodie of his own.
Zuckerberg fidgeted while telling it, emitting an awkward, I've-been-practicing-this laugh.
Zuckerberg founded Facebook in a Harvard dormitory eight years ago.
Zuckerberg, founder of the Facebook social networking website, has told Yahoo, the internet giant, that $1 billion is not enough to sell out.
Zuckerberg gis famous for his ambitious -- some might say eccentric - New Year's challenges, including learning Mandarin, meeting a new person every day and only eating meat that he kills himself.
Zuckerberg grew up in a hilltop house in Dobbs Ferry, New York.
Zuckerberg hadn’t called her before (why would someone who managed four thousand employees want to leave for a company that had barely any revenue?), but he went up and introduced himself.
Zuckerberg had two major pieces of news to share.
Zuckerberg has a fortune estimated at 6.9 billion U.S. dollars, according to Forbes magazine.
Zuckerberg has become the Robert Moses of his generation, building out not just an operating system for the web or a way to organize it -- but the web itself.
Zuckerberg has filed a lawsuit, claiming Saverin jeopardized the company by freezing Facebook's bank accounts.
Zuckerberg has said publicly that he “probably won’t” watch the movie.
Zuckerberg has tried, however, to keep Facebook nimble, despite it now having some 500 engineers.
Zuckerberg helped Narendra and the Winklevoss twins, but he soon abandoned their project in order to build his own site, which he eventually labelled Facebook.
Zuckerberg himself doesn't have much of a social life onscreen, misses parties, would rather work.
Zuckerberg, however, feels that mobile devices are the right vessel for AI assistants because you're not restricted to only engaging with them when you're home.
Zuckerberg in the kitchen where he studies Chinese every morning
Zuckerberg is famous for his ambitious -- some might say eccentric - New Year's challenges, including learning Mandarin, meeting a new person every day and only eating meat that he kills himself.
Zuckerberg is intent on cutting out all animals from his diet that he does not personally slaughter.
Zuckerberg is learning Chinese with a tutor for a holiday he plans to take to China with his girlfriend.
Zuckerberg is part of the last generation of human beings who will remember life before the Internet, though only just.
Zuckerberg is supposed to have told Ceglia he was thinking of taking the server down and wanted to give Ceglia his money back.
ZUCKERBERG "I think I've come up with something"FRIEND "That looks good.
Zuckerberg kept the meeting on track, pushing briskly through his points — no notes or whiteboard, just talking with his hands — but the tone was relaxed.
Zuckerberg launched TheFacebook.com in February 2004 and, two days later, the Winklevosses learned of the site in The Harvard Crimson.
Zuckerberg left class because he got a nasty note from a female classmate.
Zuckerberg makes it known that he has a soft spot for budding entrepreneurs.
Zuckerberg moved the company to Palo Alto, Calif., and raised hundreds of millions of dollars, making the company worth a notional $15 billion on paper. Saverin saw none of that.
Zuckerberg offered her the job of chief operating officer.
ZUCKERBERG: Or roughly the amount I paid in income tax last year, go on.
Zuckerberg pledged a $100 million donation to the Newark, New Jersey, school system this year, and he was the subject of the Hollywood movie "The Social Network".
Zuckerberg posted his own comment in response, explaining that he fixates on a personal challenge each year (in 2009, he wore a tie every day), and this year's is about animals and meat.
Zuckerberg recently asked on Facebook Questions, “What are the best mandarin [sic]-speaking cities to visit in China?”
Zuckerberg recently set up a Facebook page for "Beast, " complete with photos and a profile.
Zuckerberg recently set up a Facebook page for "Beast," complete with photos and a profile.
Zuckerberg recently set up a page for his dog Beast, including photographs and details such as his personal interests ("cuddling, loving, eating").
Zuckerberg’s ability to notice these opportunities and execute on them gave him the edge in creating and maintaining products that people believed in.
Zuckerberg's advice to "incumbents," as he calls technology giants: "Get on the bus."
Zuckerberg said at the conference on Tuesday that this move was meant to protect the private contact information of a user's friends.
Zuckerberg said at the time that he was on vacation in the Asian nation.
Zuckerberg said he expected the communications revolution he is trying to incite to take time to catch on.
Zuckerberg said he knew the product was ready when he was showing it off to his girlfriend at a restaurant in a town he didn’t usually go to.
Zuckerberg said he would do the job for $1,000, Connors said.
Zuckerberg said it was important for Facebook to succeed in China and has been mulling over the right strategy. Zuckerberg has also been preparing in other ways.
Zuckerberg's answer is that he's playing a different kind of game.
Zuckerberg's argument: People will begin to shift to an all-in-one communications service like the one his company is offering.
Zuckerberg says Facebook is tweaking its platform to help the most useful apps to spread while squelching the junk.
Zuckerberg says he's grateful that Sandberg “handles things I don't want to,” such as advertising strategy, hiring and firing, management, and dealing with political issues.
Zuckerberg says he’s grateful that Sandberg “handles things I don’t want to, ” such as advertising strategy, hiring and firing, management, and dealing with political issues.
Zuckerberg's business model depends on our shifting notions of privacy, revelation1), and sheer self-display2).
Zuckerberg’s business model depends on our shifting notions of privacy, revelation, and sheer self-display.
Zuckerberg's characteristic also has an influence on the whole company, which makes the company different from others.
Zuckerberg’s creature continues to gain users around the world (almost 600 millions).
Zuckerberg sees the world as filled with potential friends.
Zuckerberg's Facebook friends access to his email address and his cell - phone number.
Zuckerberg’s Facebook friends have access to his e-mail address and his cell-phone number.
Zuckerberg's Facebook was a key spark in the spread and organization of the recent revolts in Tunisia, Egypt, Yemen and Libya.
Zuckerberg's guide on this strange journey has been a well-known Silicon Valley chef named Jesse Cool.
Zuckerberg's learning curve has been evolutionary: moving from sea creatures to land animals.
Zuckerberg's media appearances have so far proved limited and highly controlled.
Zuckerberg's new goal came to light, not surprisingly, on Facebook.
Zuckerberg's parallels with Gates extend beyond the fact that they both started their companies at 19.
Zuckerberg speaks in a steady, mellifluous tenor; he has a long neck and tends to point his chin upward, as if aiming the bell of a saxophone.
Zuckerberg spent much of his presentation trying to explain Facebook's ambitious and broad strategy to help people communicate more efficiently.
Zuckerberg’s questions on Facebook about China seem to confirm this.
Zuckerberg's youthful fame and fortune makes for a riveting tale.
Zuckerberg's youth has given Googlers some confidence.
Zuckerberg then happened to donate $100m-worth of Facebook stock to public schools in Newark, New Jersey, on the day The Social Network just happened to be premiering in the US.
Zuckerberg unveiled Beacon with fanfare in November, famously saying, "The next hundred years will be different for advertising and it starts today."
Zuckerberg wanted to build an online version for Harvard, but the school "kept on saying that there were all these reasons why they couldn't aggregate this information, " he says.
Zuckerberg wanted to get revenge on all the women at Harvard. To do that, he involved them in a matrix that is still growing.
Zuckerberg was a 19-year-old sophomore at Harvard University in 2004 when he started a Web service called Thefacebook.com from his dorm.
Zuckerberg was in middle school when Google launched, and he seems to have a deep desire to build something that moves beyond it.
Zuckerberg was not seduced by his lifestyle.
Zuckerberg wasn’t a world-class genius, and Facebook was hardly a revolutionary idea.
Zuckerberg, who is Facebook co-founder Mark Zuckerberg’s sister, argued that putting an end to anonymity online could help curb bullying and harassment on the web.
Zuckerberg, who often turns up to his office in Palo Alto, California, wearing Adidas sandals, took exception to10 a drawing in The Wall Street Journal because it showed him wearing a shirt with a collar instead of his habitual T-shirt.
Zuckerberg, who reportedly has some of his own jerky qualities, might well be the one to take Jobs' place as Top Geek.
Zuckerberg, who said more than 350 million of Facebook's half-billion users now actively send and receive messages on his website, did not expect people to stop using traditional email tomorrow.
Zuckerburg faced strong competition when he entered the social network business.
Zuckerburg has also been able to do two other difficult things.
Zuckerburg said that entrepreneurs should break rules. Forget the conventional way of doing things, even if it’s considered “best practice”.
Zuckerkandl dehiscence
Zuckerman and his team traveled to places as diverse as Qatar and Pittsburgh and photographed about 90 species of birds.
Zuckerman Bound A Trilogy and Epilogue
Zuckerman did not allow her to take Wilbur out, and he did not allow her to get into the pigpen.
Zuckerman et al. found pupil dilation to be a fairly good indicator of deception.
Zuckerman fiddled that song very nicely.
Zuckerman is a research associate for homeland security and Latin America at the Heritage Foundation.
Zuckerman isn't trying to show birds in their natural habitat.
Zuckerman isnt trying to show birds in their natural habitat.
Zuckerman knew that a manure pile is a good place to keep a young pig.
Zuckerman praised David’s “gentle decency” and the “range of his public interests.”
Zuckerman says, "Food was the only tool at my disposal for motivating the birds to pose."
Zuckerman was coming down toward him carrying a pail.
Zuck knows his purpose regardless of external pressures, and provides clear direction for long-term strategy.
Zuck ,  lives  in a modest house in Alto and often walks to the office.
Zuck spends a lot of time looking at product mocks, and is involved pretty deeply with the site's look and feel.
Zuck's style is so poor, it even inspired a mock fashion line, Mark By Mark Zuckerberg, which thankfully doesn't sell any actual clothing.
Zuckuss and 4-LOM joined the Rebellion for a very brief period.
Zuckuss cobbled the droid back together, and began to rethink his decision to join the Alliance.
Zuckuss, touched by the Rebels' devotion to one another, had a change of heart.
Zu dem Patrouillengang meldeten  sich viele Freiwillige, obwohl sie ü ber die Gefahren v ? llig  imBild  waren.
Zudem  sollen die Sender auf ihre  bisherigenWerbeeinnahmen  verzichten - was ihren finanziellen Spielraumempfindlich einschr? nkt.
Zu dieser Jahreszeiten ist in Peking fast ausschlie? lich sch? nes Wetter.
Zuerst dachte ich , das haette etwas mit Enten zu tun.
Zues - Summons 1 dead fallen team - mate when you die.
Zues - Summons 1 dead fallen team-mate when you die.
Zu, external culture exchange is a important component that China culture exchanges externally.
ZU : Finding an alien is much easier than finding a good drummer in Beijing.
Zuger notes that "the boundaries of 'normal' height are hazy, and the drug's performance is measured only in averages."
zugu2 Cheapflights has launched its second Zugu metasearch site in less than a month – using the ITB exhibition in Berlin to unveil a local version for the German market.
ZuGuang blood wrote on the ground baiguan HangShu four words herring death.
Zuguang husband always remember the day his wife sent her in the fire of drink milk in the message, "do not know that she did not eat soy?"
Zugu, on the other hand, uses a transaction model based on cost per acquisition.
Zuhal hopes to become a professional pianist and Iraq's first female conductor.
Zuhal started to play the piano aged 6, after her mother noticed how she would try to mimic television theme tunes on a toy piano at home.
Zuhal was put in touch with a Channel 4 project called Battlefront, which is following 20 teenagers over nine months as they campaign for issues they care about.
Zuheir Khlaif wants to know how American schools use educational technology.
zuhe taiyang wangyuanjing(SPAR)
Zuhying: Just received fine message from Zqhwei through Red Cross.
Zuihulu appears to record events with his mobile phone as he rides past crowds of protesters on the back of a motorbike, describing what he sees in a thick regional dialect.
Zui", in addition to meaning drunk".
zu~- = —iLu~-, where L is the square root operator.
ZU : I spent one happy year in UK and got my degree sucessfully.
ZU: It was a great time for us, and we were happy with it.
Zuiu We need the chinese to make our stuff, China needs us to buy their stuff. That's a symbiant circle that won't be broken easily or soon.
ZUJI in its sole discretion, reserves the right to modify the rules and terms of this promotion from time to time and without prior notice.
ZUJI is not responsible for booking requests received after the promotion deadline as a consequence of telephone or internet service delays, interruptions, failures or overloads.
ZUJI makes no warranties, express or implied, with respect toe-voucher, including without limitation, any express or implied warranty of merchantability or fitness for a particular purpose.
Zujuyin Ganjingxue Points of Liver Meridian of FootJueyin, LR.
Zu kaempfen， zu siegen， zu sterben den Tod.
Zuk and Bailey were also struck by the idea that evolutionary biologists have been missing an important piece of the puzzle.
Zuk and Bailey were intrigued by the idea that there might be common factors in these various theories.
Zuk Dau, has dealt with the Burman-led central government since the army started offensive wars against the CPB in Shan State in 1961.
Zuker and his colleagues posed a natural evolutionary question: Why would mammals have developed such an excellent carbon dioxide detector?
Zuker’s company Senomyx develops artificial flavors, and have disclosed that they have a partnership with Coca Cola, among other companies.
Zuko: Almost tastes like Fire Nation food. Just isn't seasoned enough.
Zukunft said determining when to finalize operations in any given area involves discussions with all interested parties.
ZUL , an XML-formatted and easy-to read language, is used to describe the above registration form.
Zuleika and three other Na'vi are held in a chainlink cage, under guard.
Zuleika emerges from the water at the edge of a small glade.
Zuleika grabs Josh's hand and pulls him into the circle of dancers.
Zuleikah covers her face with her hands, and drops down in an attitude of the most beautiful despair.
Zuleika runs along beneath a fallen treetrunk while a gunship tries to hit her with its cannon. It fires rockets and she dives into a pond as the jungle explodes.
Zuleika's eyes flash with anger.
Zuleika takes him up a fallen trunk, and soon they are running along branches that are 30 meters above the ground. Josh can't think.
Zuleika tells her mother that Josh wants to speak to Gaia... to tell her about the aliens.
ZULETA, Bernardo
Zulfahmi Arrasuli, a senior natural disaster volunteer in Padang, said that many people in the city do not know what to do if a tsunami or earthquake occurs.
Zulfan Effendi, a 36-year-old palm-oil farmer from the western island of Sumatra, says he used to struggle to make ends meet.
Zulfikar Ali Bhutto did this when choosing Benazir to run his Pakistan People's Party, overlooking his son, Murtaza, who was also a member of parliament.
Zulfikarpasic said the challenge for Mr. Sarkozy is to explain how the government can spend billions of euros on bailouts but not have enough money for people who have lost their jobs.
Zulfiqar A Bhutta is the professor and chairman, department of paediatrics & child health, and Syed Rehan Ali is an assistant professor, both at the Aga Khan University, Karachi, Pakistan.
Zulfiqar A. Bhutta sets out the constraints faced by members of ERCs in developing countries, and offers suggestions of what could be done to improve the situation.
Zulfiya Tursunova, 20 years old, gave birth to a girl, Samera, in 2007, only to learn months later that she had TB.
ZulGurub coin and bijou drops were increased.
Zulihe River basin in Gansu
Zuli Rivers basin.
ZU : Living a very normal life as most of the office workers.
Zul'jin snarled at the thought, the sound fortunately absorbed by his thick scarf.
Zülküf, , a half-wit, who lives in an isolated rural town and works as an undertaker for his uncle in the local mosque.
Zulliger Z Test
Zul: The dark thief is a simple and fun game which consists in to achieve different objectives in the dark using a flashlight!
Zulu and Xhosa version will be available soon and other languages will follow.
Zulu ethnic groups to pursue the practice of polygamy, the group of Zuma, who married 6 times and has 18 children.
Zulu heroes now do not level up.
Zulu is a DJ software program for performing live mixes.
ZULU, Justin B.
Zuma accused ziller with a relationship of women suffering from AIDS, and whether Zuma of South Africa from the moral leadership of the people questioned.
Zuma added: “Guns make even the lousiest cowards feel like heroes and there are just too many of them around.
Zuma and King Goodwill Zwelithini, who has five wives, were among guests at the ceremony in Nongoma, KwaZulu-Natal Province, last weekend.
Zuma and South African Foreign Affairs Minister Nkosazana Dlamini-Zuma divorced in 1998 and another wife committed suicide in 2000.
Zuma appeared anoint his deputy for the job.
Zuma appeared to anoint his deputy for the job.
Zuma, as head of the ANC, is widely expected to become South Africa's next president in elections in two weeks.
Zuma, a Zulu former herdboy and polygamist (soon to acquire a fourth wife), has an increasingly difficult job.
Zuma did not say how his government would fund the increased HIV treatment, but the United States has announced it is giving South Africa $120 million over the next two years for AIDS treatment drugs.
Zuma failed to mediate the second result, most of the Libyan people already mentally prepared.
Zuma had maintained the sex was consensual and the accusations were part of a campaign to destroy his political career.
Zuma has become a big story in the international media but more as a subject of political caricature than much else.
Zuma has faced significant legal challenges.
Zuma himself in a trial that AIDS in women with a bath after a relationship, to avoid HIV infection.
Zuma is still to make his mark as president. Now he will be under even greater pressure to explain how the ANC is going to meet its plethora of election promises.
Zumalacarregui y de Imaz, Tomas de
Zu Maotang, now president of the Farmer's Association of Gaobeidian City in the northern Chinese province of Hebei, was possibly the first Chinese farmer to plant a GM crop.
Zuma said, "BRIC countries" has become the birth of the concept of a multilateral diplomatic efforts to promote the collective quantification of global governance changes.
Zuma said in a statement: "AU roadmap is still valid, and we hope that all forces at the negotiating table to discuss to solve the problem of Libya."
Zuma said Monday the President met with the ministers over the past few days and ordered them to resolve the strike in interest of the country.
Zuma said that Gaddafi insisted "that all Libyan citizens enjoy the right to express their views" to determine the country's future direction.
Zuma said that Gaddafi's future can only be decided through negotiations.
Zuma said that when the economy grew that had to benefit ordinary people.
Zuma said the ANC would fight poverty but the state would focus on development, not welfare.
Zuma said the global economic crisis highlighted the need to reform the international financial system and multilateral lending groups like the World Bank and International Monetary Fund.
Zuma said the international community should not be biased or some foreign media reports, but should also listen to the voice of Libya.
Zuma said the South African government has infrastructure, agriculture, mining, manufacturing, green economy and tourism as key sectors to create employment opportunities.
Zuma said: "you can in the water breathing and is my mother's friend lynne is beautiful."
Zuma says the world should continue with the same resolve that led to the end of slavery, colonialism and apartheid.
Zuma's campaign was boosted by the presence of former president and anti-apartheid icon Nelson Mandela, who delivered a pre-recorded message.
Zuma's sex life has been the focus of intense scrutiny and criticism in South Africa.
Zuma's supporters greeted the decision with street celebrations saying he could now assume the nation's highest office without the cloud of suspicion over his head.
Zuma's trip to Libya last week was on behalf of the African Union, Yang added.
Zuma suspected that the president had taken the opportunity to force out a growing political threat.
Zuma tells supporters to avoid violence.
Zuma, the current president of S Africa is openly shopping for partners, and will facilitate entry into his country based on what they offer him in return.
Zuma told the as playing, but this changed in a different way!
Zuma, until recently, faced fraud and corruption charges. The country's prosecuting authority dropped the charges two weeks before the elections, citing alleged political interference in the case.
Zuma urged South Africans not to be apprehensive, but did not offer them the certainty they hoped for in the wake of Mr. Mbeki's resignation.
Zuma was once considered a strong contender to succeed President Thabo Mbeki, who fired him because of corruption-related accusations last year.
Zuma, who resigned as South Africa's deputy president four years ago because of the charges, said he had been vindicated.
Zumba advocates full devotion and all freedom while dancing regardless of the steps or the tempo of music.
ZUMBA and Other Dance Workouts.
Zum babway's opposition movement for democratic change has agreed to join a unity government with President Robert Morgaby next month a spiraling economic and humanitarian in crisis.
Zumba, yoga, jogging, tennis, boxing, or a brisk walk—it doesn't matter how you exercise as long as you do it consistently.
Zumberge said a conventional seismometer records how its mass is displaced by these waves of seismic energy with electric circuit boards.
Zumbusch psoriasis
Zumegloph also made a presentation to Peng Li about Kirghizia's economic situation.
Zumegloph also made a presentation to Peng Li about Kirghizia's economic situation.
Zumegloph expressed his thanks for this and accepted the invitation happily.
Zumegloph said that the two countries of China and Kirghizia had a traditional friendly relationship and this relationship was increasingly strengthened and continuously developing.
Zu Mittag essen Robert und Hans in der Mensa.
Zum Muttertag, zum Muttertag, will ich dir sagen, dass ich dich mag.
ZumoDrive, a new cloud storage service that looks and feels like a native drive on your desktop, just opened up its public beta program.
ZumoDrive's original prices during the private beta were a bit on the steep side, but the company has now reduced its prices.
Zumthor always prefers knowledge, thought, order, in a century when man is looking for simple pleasures, immediate and ephemeral.
Zumthor, consistently mindful of the use of the materials, and specifically their construction details, has used grey brick to unite the destroyed fragments of the site.
Zumthor has  transformed  technical and rational solutions into sensual and poetic situations.
Zumthor is similar to a hermit hidden amongst the mountains, or a gardener who dedicates all of his efforts in looking after his own garden, carving out his dream one bit at a time .
Zumthor's architecture has nothing to hide from us: It is a direct sign that doesn't throw back to other meanings.
Zumthor's creation is never about visual impact, but instead focuses on the beauty of serenity.
Zumthor's creations exuberate with a sense of natural minimalism.
Zumthor was born in Basel, Switzerland on April 26, 1943, the son of a cabinet-maker. After graduating from the Basel School of Arts And Crafts, he left for New York to study at the Pratt Institute.
Zunafish - Everyone has been talking about Zunafish this year, including TIME magazine and Oprah Winfrey.
Zunbao building's concept design should be straight and clear, to highlight the vision performance of architecture application, to show the arch entire shape and night effects.
Zundt says diesel vehicles are the main cause of air pollution in Sao Paulo.
Zundt says these diesel vehicles are the main causes cause of air pollution in Sao Paulo.
Zundt says the vehicle releases only water vapor and is" totally clean" .
Zune Car Pack ($80 - FM tuner, car charger)
Zune devices can be used to browse networks in order to discover and access user’s music as part of the media experience they already offer.
Zune Home A/V Pack ($100 - dock, remote, AV cables, extra battery, sync cable, adapter)
Zune is the company’s music player, which is only available in the US, and similar to Apple’s iTunes, it has its own music download online store.
Zune – Microsoft built a decent portable music player, but the Zune was never able to grab more than 2% market share against the iPod’s 70%, and was recently discontinued.
Zune players are current limited to 30 GB of music.
Zunes can be plugged into the Xbox to play music, as can Apple iPods.
Zune, the software's media player, was working too, with both music and video content running quickly and clearly.
Zung self-rating anxiety scale;
Zunhua is home to the 24th Fighter Division of the PLA Air Force.
Zunhua is located in the near reach of Beijing and Tianjin and has rich tourism resources, but the tourism resources here are not fully exploited.
Zuniga, 23, was picked up late on Monday at a military checkpoint in the western Mexican state of Jalisco while traveling with seven armed men in two vehicles carrying $100, 000 in cash.
Zuniga has been linked with Milan, Fiorentina, Palermo, Sevilla, Arsenal and West Ham over the last month.
Zuniga is originally from Culiacan, the capital of Sinaloa state, birthplace of one of Mexico's most powerful cartels.
Zun Jing de Hu Jintao zhu xi ji Fu Ren, (Respected President Hu Jintao and Mrs. Hu)
Zun Long's founder, David Dear, graduated in Law from Exeter University in England.
Zun-Nun said in a smile, "That is the answer to your question —someone cannot be valued only by what they wear, but the people in the market give value in that way."
Zun-Nun smiled to him and said, "Now go to the gold shop and show this ring to the owner."
ZU : No, because it is difficult to find a church in Beijing.
Zun of ⑤ armour saltpetre : Excited word much or depressed, insomnia, behavior is disorder wait.
ZU: Nothing special for us.
Zunun Kadir, the famous writer, playwright and fabulist, was the founder and the pioneer of the contemporary Uighur literature.
Zunyi, Battle of
Zunyi city, as a target area , its natural resources, industrial structure and interrelation have been studied according to the industrial structure theory .
Zunyi Conference and the Third Plenary Session of the Eleventh Central Committee are both meetings at the turning points for the Communist Party of China's historical course.
Zunyi has the beautiful bier of skin to wash milk sell?
Zunyi is a garden city.
Zunyi Kangsheng pharmaceutical Co. , Ltd. is an herb medicine solely invested civil managed enterprise which has ethnic characteristics.
"Zunyi medical and surgical affiliated hospitals in guizhou province, was awarded the "excellent project "and engineering quality highest award of guizhou, "huanguoshu cup.
Zunyi Medical College campus in Zhuhai succession of "hard work, rigorous scholarship, unity and hard work, pragmatic and pioneering" spirit of compliance.
Zunyi Medical College (ZMC), a key medical college at the provincial level in Guizhou Province, is located in Zunyi, a historically, culturally and scenically celebrated city.
Zunyi prefecture; new countryside construction; path for development;
Zunzhangshouji implement a standard strict in demands, not bad.
Zunz, Olivier. The Changing Face of Inequality: Urbanization, Industrial Development, and Immigrants in Detroit, 1880-1920. 1982.
Zuo also points out that adolescents are especially vulnerable to family tensions and may take the wrong path if parents fail to tackle crises in their relationship.
Zuobashi when you travel, you have enough time to glance at the notebook bar the other day.
Zuoce simple remote control operation, to achieve a multi - function control button.
Zuoding people , the judges will be washed by a good 12 people from licensing .
Zuo Feiyo and Ku Bai gathered some dry branches and made a fire below the tower .
Zuo Feiyo keyed in some commands and a bright light suddenly surrounded them. An authentic vista of the Miao area came into view.
Zuo Feiyo's slap just now had alerted her. Ku Bai was also a human being; someone of the opposite sex who adored her.
Zuo Fen's literary achievements held an important position in the literary history of the pre-Tang Dynasty and should be paid attention to by contemporary writers.
Zuof is often able to head off a danger in the fid&amp; Shurnaeher is very aggressive and bound in personality on the field.
Zuof is often able to head off a danger in the fid& Shurnaeher is very aggressive and bound in personality on the field.
Zuof is often able to head off a danger in the field. Shumacher is very aggressive and bound in personality on the field.
Zuo Gongjiao can not walk, can not fight Zuogong Jiao, do not drive can not drive.
Zuogui Pill can aim directly at adjusted 12 genes' expression.
Zuo Gui Yin treat female climacteric syndrome clinical curative effect observation
Zuo Gupiao you? I Zuogu Piao , but the bad stock market.
Zuo had visited his wife monthly according to his colleague.
Zuo Jiang and You Jiang Uprisings
Zuojian themselves to a man when you please, do not so impressed.
Zuo Jin and I have been friends for many years. Although, as the saying goes, "familiarity breeds contempt, " whenever I have seen Zuo Jin's oil paintings, I have been consistently surprised.
Zuo Jin's style of humor has also served him well in his career a cartoonist.
Zuo Jin's style of humor has also served him well in his career as a cartoonist.
Zuo Jun was appointed Deputy Director of Chongqing Bureau of Quality and Technical Supervision (with probation of one year). (2009.09.27)
Zuola : The two people who came this morning under the pretense that I'd violated the one child policy are here with Security Dir .
Zuolong Village is a typical Dong Minority village that maintains many original eco-cultures and possesses relatively unabridged spatial structure.
Zuo meal alcoholic, call meal alcoholic again.
Zuo pointed to other Asian countries, including Japan, Korea and Singapore, where fertility rates have been steadily declining, and said he believes that China is heading in that direction as well.
Zuo QingHou was most proud of three things.
Zuo Qiuming knowledgeable, virtuous, Confucius made with the same shame.
Zuo Qiuming, surnamed Zuo Qiu, were out , late Spring and Autumn Lu.
Zuo Quan County is located in the northern foot of Taihang, hilly territory, ravines crossbar, and suitable for the growth of walnut tree.
Zuoquan enjoy Ocean Songs of praise.
Zuo Quan folk tune flowering of Enlightenment in the Ming and Qing dynasties, under the leadership of the Communist Party in protest, has been to explore, organize and sung.
Zuo Quan in Shanxi folk folk tune flower occupies a very prominent position.
Zuoquan local opera.
Zuo  Quan  Su - walnut production to nuts satiated, thin, big, wei xiang known.
Zuoquan Zhao. Spatial Organization and Economic Growth. Institute of Policy and Management, Chinese Academy of Sciences.
Zuoren be fair, do not be afraid;
Zuo River Shanxiu Hydropower Station
Zuo said the results of the recycling program have been exceptional, but now they have another worry in keeping the incinerator fed.
Zuosan international express (ZSE) is your trusted partner with strong financial.
Zuo's Commentary on Spring and Autumn Annals and History of the Peloponnesian Warare two great historical works reflecting contemporary social panorama by war.
Zuo's Commentary records a lot materials concerning human prognostic in three categories: behavior prognostic, speech prognostic and mien prognostic, reflecting both ground and logic.
Zuo's Commentary
ZuoShaoQing finally understand, release Hou Lianhai is leaf GongJin serious error, is a man at any time can be hold in your hand.
ZuoShaoQing had a presentiment of danger.
ZuoShaoQing relationship with mace is deeply concerned about him.
ZuoShaoQing tomorrow will go to the last of the secret intelligence building defensive works department took over the locust tree, she forced to calm her sad mood at the moment.
Zuo Sheng time before starting the next day will be recorded in the book on safety issues to staff comment, so that workers avoid repeating mistakes.
Zuo Shuyi, an 18-year-old freshman at Sichuan University, calls the holiday season "the right time for boys to show their love in a more symbolic way".
Zuo Shuyi, an 18-year-old freshman at Sichuan University, calls the holiday season "the right time for boys to show their love in a more symbolic way"。
Zuo Sikong was the title of an official position in China of the Han Dynasty.
Zuo Sikong was the title of an official position in China of the Han Dynasty.
Zuotan Ganii plastic factory is located In the national largest furniture manufacture base.
Zuotang medicine is for patients in medicine stores Zhenmo doctor of Chinese medicine doctor.
ZuoTongJun his brigade major, the first time found out shoot down his enemy, found unexpectedly is his own disciples Jiang Hai.
ZuoTongJun play after Jiang Hai, tell he has to help him fill out the application form political commissar.
Zuotongning injection can obviously inhibit the writhing action induced by acetic acid and enhance the analgesic effect induced by the hot-plate test in mice.
Zuo Wenqi, manager of North China Branch, director of North China Bureau, came to visit the workers in North Ordos working area.
Zuo Xiaolei, chief economist at Galaxy Securities held 20 that a certain forum.
Zuoxiao singing at the wine, he was heard, singing chicken Qingjiang.
Zuoxiao Zuzhou's photograph of heaped pigs refers to Chinese motifs of happiness, luck, and abundance, yet is still indicative of the violent and grotesque.
Zuo Xuejin, male, born in October1949, received a doctor's degree from the Department of Economics of University of Pittsburgh.
Zuoying Wannian Folklore Festival has transformed from a local activity into a traditional celebration exemplifying Taiwan's traditions, culture, religions, and beliefs.
Zuoyituo landslide
Zuo Yong of the Chongqing Administration of Commerce and Industry has told Xinhua, that Wal-Mart "violated laws and regulations and infringed upon the rights of consumers."
"Zuoyou" after a number means "about".
Zuoyou after a number means about.
' Zuoyouhong'vine was high hardy, high yield and high disease-resistance.
Zuoyuezi broadly comes down to two concepts: restoring nutrients and restricting movement.
ZuoYuKun in detention by people die of poison, zhao minister tied behind the door and seriously injuring grenades, all involved in the killing of lane width, have been repaid.
ZuoYuKun tied on the carriage, ready to sent to the headquarters.
Zuozhao holding lever 13, on behalf of the war.
Zuo Zhongliang to explain to Japanese father mother don't know at home, but he is not, only to tell the truth, Japanese said to the Flying Tigers in his hand.
Zuo Zhongmo, deputy secretary-general of the Conference, said, "This is not just an issue of agriculture. These reclaimed lands can serve the general development purposes of various sectors, including forestry, industry and tourism."
"Zuo Zhuan" appears unique on narrative.
"Zuo Zhuan" by the academic attention in the Wei and Jin Dynasties, there have been Xuan, Du Yu for their comments, after a study, "Autumn" important books.
Zuo Zhuan had a standpoint of a nation while Records of Historian held a more magnanimous standpoint of the concerning people and the future of a country.
"Zuo Zhuan hidden Year Year", "Yi I am alone no", or "Analects of Confucius Yen-Yuan" articles "I die alone.
"Zuo Zhuan" impact on future generations is reflected in the history area.
Zuo Zhuan includes many fiction elements as a famous history book; with the development of literature, this character is separated from history gradually.
Zuozhuan includes religious phenomenon and activities adoring nature and agricultural god, spirit and sign, unusual being, heralding, divining etc.
"Zuo Zhuan" in the history of the status has been commented as following the "Book of History", "Spring", the opening "Historical Records", "Han" the first of its kind of important books.
Zuo Zhuan is annalistic style concerning writing things with elegant language style rela…
Zuozhuan is closely related with the excellent tradition in ancient Chinese historiography, the very source of the many excellent Chinese traditions.
Zuo Zhuan is commonly recognized as the model of "poetic citation".
" Zuo Zhuan "is not only the history books, is also a very good literature.
ZuoZhuan is one of the greatest records of history as well as a wonderful classical literature in China. There are plenty of which concentrate on the text itself.
Zuozhuan is the first complete historical work in China.
Zuo Zhuan; narrative; clue; narrative logic focus; viewpoint.
"Zuo Zhuan" records the historical facts about the decline of the royal family and the contending for hegemony of lords during the Spring and Autumn Period.
Zuozhuan takes both the extremely beautiful and the extremely ugly as the destructive forces;
"Zuo Zhuan" universal "Zuo Zhuan", formerly known as "Zuo Spring and Autumn", the Han Dynasty, also known as "Zuo", "Zuo.
Zuo zongtang and irrigation construction of gansu.
Zuo Zongtang a well-known figure in Chinese modern history, is a high-ranking officer in the late Qing Dynasty.
Zuozongtang had a deep ideological foundation when he recovered xinjiang.
Zuo Zongtang of the Qing Dynasty made a cup of Fuliang tea, read a Song Yuan Ming poetry, really Savage shifters also" plaint;"
Zuo Zongtang proposed that the government build a shipyard.
Zuo Zong - tangs western  expedition  is an important military operation that had profound influence upon western development.
Zupan expects faculty to mine the crisis for examples that illustrate those dangers in order to teach students.
Zup . It's hard to say how one tool or another will conduct in different markets.
Zuppa del duca eventually made its way to Treviso, just northwest of Venice, in the northeastern province of Veneto.
Zuqiang Yan, vice warden of MinHang District, and Wen Shen, board chairman& GM of Shanghai Zizhu Science-based Industrial Park were present during the meeting.
Zurabishvili said that Georgia would as always adhere to the one-China policy and resolutely support China on significant issues concerning China's national unity and territorial integrity.
Zurabishvili said that the Georgian government values its relations with China and highly praises China's advocation that countries, big or small, rich or poor, strong or weak, are all equal.
Zurab Noghaideli, hitherto finance minister, becomes premier.
Zuraidah Ibrahim, Straits Times' columnist, correctly said that Muslims are reluctant to be labelled as "moderate Muslims" if it means that they are defined as being less religious.
Zuraidah Ibrahim, Straits Times' columnist, correctly said that Muslims are reluctant to be labelled as "moderate Muslims" if it means that they are defined as being less religious.
ZU RANTZAU, Detlev Graf
Zurbarán’s “Jacob and his Twelve Sons”, 1640-45, was bought for Auckland Castle by Bishop Richard Trevor in 1756.
Zur Hausen, 72, was honored for his discovery of "human papilloma viruses (HPV) causing cervical cancer, " the second most common cancer among women.
Zur Hausen said that while vaccination programmes should focus on girls and young women aged 9 to 25, before they are exposed to HPV, boys must also be vaccinated to eliminate the virus.
Zurich and Geneva follow in second and third position, respectively, while Vancouver and Auckland remain joint fourth in the rankings.
Zurich Asia holds the record for the most expensive single Chinese stamp sold at auction ─ an 1897 Red Revenue stamp that fetched HK$2.6 million in 2009.
Zurich Asia's auction, which starts Saturday, is its biggest to date.
Zurich, at the northern tip of its namesake lake, is of course a metropolis and one of the country's major cultural centers.
Zurich-based power and automation technology leader ABB said China has become its No 1 revenue market when it announced its 2006 fiscal performance in the Chinese market in Beijing on Friday.
Zurich beat Geneva into second place, while Vancouver in Canada was third.
Zurich -born Blatter also suggested that foreign players are taking precedence over home- grown talent at many clubs in Germany and England.
Zurich came second, Toronto third and S & atilde ; o Paulo, Brazil, tied for fourth with Berlin.
Zurich came second, Toronto third and S? o Paulo, Brazil, tied for fourth with Berlin.
Zurich classificatio
Zurich comes out so well because politically stable, it's multilingual and it's bang in the middle of Europe.
Zurich Commodity Fund accepts switches out order only with effect from 20 February 2010.
Zurich -- Europe's largest indoor Christmas market is hosted in Zurich's main railway station.
Zurich Financial Services AG climbed 2.7 percent to 238.9 Swiss francs and Swiss Reinsurance Co. advanced 2 percent to 49.56 francs.
Zurich Financial Services Group Chief Economist Daniel Hoffman said one of those issues is economic disparity.
Zurich Financial Services Group
Zurich Financial Services is focusing its resources on developing its core Property&amp; Casualty business.
Zurich Financial Services is focusing its resources on developing its core Property & Casualty business.
Zurich, Geneva and Vancouver made the top three in the list while Bangui in the Central African Republic and Brazzaville , the capital of Congo Republic, joined Baghdad in the bottom three.
Zurich Gold Pool
Zurich hazard analysis allows the systematic identification and management of all types of risks.
Zurich-headquartered SAM Sustainable Asset Management, manages assets worth 7 billion euros ($10 billion) in total and has $2.5 billion invested in water-related companies.
Zurich, in contrast, has made throwing things away nearly impossible - and also costly.
Zurich Insurance Company is not a subsidiary or an affiliate of American Express.
Zurich Insurance Company is the first General Insurance company in Taiwan to be organized into customer divisions aiming to serve its customers more efficiently.
Zurich Insurance Company reserves the final right of approval of the Plan.
Zurich Insurance Co.
Zurich in Switzerland and Toronto in Canada followed close behind.
Zurich is also a major transportation hub.
Zurich is in Switzerland and it's very high in the mountains.
Zurich is situated where the river Limmat issues from the north-western end of Lake Zurich, about 30 km north of the Alps.
Zurich is the biggest city in Switzerland and is also known as the most important city for banking3.
Zurich is the center of the German - speaking part of Switzerland.
Zurich is the center of the German-speaking part of Switzerland.
Zurich is the center of the Germanspeaking part of Switzerland.
Zurich is the heart of chocolate production in the country.
Zurich itself remains a haven for chocolate-lovers, with cozy chocolate shops nestled among the big Swiss banks, like UBS and Credit Suisse, along the noble Bahnhofstrasse.
Zurich know us well, they found great motivation at San Siro and it will be like that tomorrow as well;
Zurich Life Insurance Company Limited has taken all reasonable care to ensure the information in this brochure is accurate at the time of printing and accepts responsibility accordingly.
ZURICH/MIAMI, July 13 (Reuters) - A federal court judge in Miami approved a delay in a high-profile trial on Monday in which U.S. tax authorities hoped to force UBS AG (
Zurich officials established the animal lawyer office in 1992, and Mr. Goetschel is the third lawyer to hold the job.
Zurich power plants that used to burn local trash to make electricity now burn garbage from Germany instead.
ZURICH (Reuters) - AC Milan playmaker Kaka added to his remarkable haul of trophies and titles on Monday when he was named FIFA World Player 2007.
ZURICH( Reuters)- A mystery campaigner has asked the Swiss to name their preferred capital, by mobile phone text.
ZURICH (Reuters) - Investors battered by a credit crisis could look beyond equities and bonds in their quest for returns: those with a keen eye are beginning to see bargains in contemporary art.
ZURICH (Reuters) - Swiss banks including ZKB and Mirabaud are pulling out of business with individuals who pay U.S. taxes, newspaper Neue Zuercher Zeitung (NZZ) reported on Saturday.
ZURICH (Reuters) - Wealth managers are urging millionaire clients to sell shares and build up cash until stock markets settle and low prices provide new buying opportunities.
Zurich riot police officers carry a protester as they remove members of the Occupy Paradeplatz movement from the Lindenhof in Zurich, on November 15, 2011. (Reuters/Christian Hartmann)
Zurichs affluence came initially from cornering a sizeable chunk of the12th Century silk trade.
Zurich's affluence came initially from cornering a sizeable chunk of the 14th Century silk trade.
Zurichs affluence came initially from cornering a sizeable chunk of the14th Century silk trade.
Zurich Schauspielhaus
Zurich's Platzpitz park needle exchange project in the mid-1980s led to the decision by authorities not to police the park on the grounds that it would focus drug use in one place.
Zurich's program has spread throughout Switzerland over the last two years. Many other European countries are implementing programs of their own, with varying strategies.
Zurich's residents boast the world's greatest earning power, according to Forbes magazine. On average, the city's workers make $22.60 an hour after taxes.
Zurich Stock Exchange
Zurich, Switzerland…and more of that in the next blog.
ZURICH, Switzerland (AP)—Nikolai Valuev likely ended Evander Holyfield's last chance at winning a fifth heavyweight title, narrowly defending his WBA title by majority decision on Saturday night.
Zurich, Switzerland, August 30, 2007 – ABB signed a $25 million contract with Kenya Power &amp;Lighting Co (KPLC) to upgrade and expand the system that controls Kenya's power transmission network and the distribution network in the capital city of Nairobi.
ZURICH, Switzerland, March 14 (UPI) -- Switzerland is bowing to international pressure, agreeing to end its policy of allowing secretive banking, officials said.
Zurich, Switzerland, Oct. 5, 2007 – ABB, the leading power and automation technology group, has received an order worth $110 million from E.
ZURICH The most notable thing about garbage in this picture-perfect medieval city is that it's nearly impossible to find any.
Zurich, the norheaster city of  Switzerland  was named as the best place to live in the world, a previous study by the Mercer consultant firm showed.
Zurich, the norheaster city of Switzerland was named as the best place to live in the world, a previous study by the Mercer consultant firm showed.
Zurich voters reject ban on "suicide tourism".
Zurich was ranked second, followed by Auckland, New Zealand, and Munich and Dusseldorf.
Zurich Zoological Garden
ZURITA, Juan F.
Zur Kritik der politischen Oekonomie
Zurovcik and Riviello had been planning a trial of the device in Rwanda--Riviello spends about half his time working in Africa--when the earthquake hit Haiti.
Zuruggu 559: It immediately launches a Headbutt attack at any enemy who locks eyes with it. It has a very hard skull.
Zuruzukin 560: The one with the biggest crest is chosen as the group's leader. Its kicking attacks demolish concrete blocks.
Zurvan is mentioned in the Origins of Alchemy Shamanic &Esoteric.
Zurvan is the Persian god of infinite time, space and fate.
Zusanli acupoint injection
Zuse also introduced the first algorithmic programming language called Plankalkül for his Z4 computer.
Zu sent when the paper money burned a lot of financial offerings in order to "enjoy their ancestors."
Zuse rebuilt the Z3 15 years after the war ended, to demonstrate its capabilities and to establish his claim to the patents associated with the machine.
Zuse's achievement, according to his son, was even more remarkable considering he worked independently, even in isolation, and remained unaware of contemporary developments in computer science.
Zu Shan, Tao - lin lake infrastructure are improving tourist attractions, rural tourism has started.
Züst believes that breeding for higher yields has led to greater susceptibility to pests and pathogens, resulting in increased pesticide use worldwide.
Züst's team grew the model plant Arabidopsis thaliana with the genes for trichomes (leaf hairs that discourage herbivores) and glucosinolate (a chemical toxic to certain pests) disabled.
ZU TANG JI has attracted the attention of scholars because of its great academic value. Several published versions of its proofreading and annotation have reflected the research conditions.
Zu Temple in Foshan, Guangdong Province, has a wide influence on the religion in Southeast Asia.
ZU: That gig was in Shanghai, we spent a wonderful day there and made some new friends.
Zu Ti and Liu Kun often talked about the country's situation till late into the night, and each time they talking very excitedly again.
Zu Ti's Northern March and the Reasons of the Failure.
Zu Town Village Township Government in the bovine heart.
'Zuuma doesn't have any big sales yet,' he said. 'We'll start decreasing our OEM orders when Zuuma can cover our company's costs.'
Zuvekas, A. , Wells, B. L. , Lefkowitz, B. (2000). Mexican American infant mortality rate: implications for public policy. Journal of Health Care of the Poor and Underserved. 11(2), 243-57.
ZU: We are working on the new stuff now, hope the new album can be finished within 2008.
Zuwei and thousands like him hope Libya will not be Spain for the Facebook generation.
ZuWei just pass by, but more to zhuo or when not insult, XinYong look but eye has to offer to help zhuo ors.
Zuwei puts the demographics of the rebels in more simple terms: "We are just the Libyan people trying to reclaim out political rights."
Zuwei says rebels captured most of their weapons from government troops.
ZuXing high-profile held a conference to announce marla rich second generation child inscription a stake in the company;
Zuxing Metallic Pigments dedicates itself to the mission of being a world class supplier of metallic pigments.
ZuXing using small shareholder funds for money laundering crime group, lead to share price floating, people seek charges, to the media attention.
ZuYi incurred after listen to big yue, feel that makes sense.
Zuyue Sun. Research Progress of male reproductive toxicity. Chinese Pharmacology Letters 2004, 21(4): 5.
Zuzhang (the head of a clan) was the supreme leader in Huizhou patriarchal clans in the Qing Dynasty.
Zuzi's natural science is an important part of Huizou culture, infiltrating many Huizou material-culture's relics.
Zu Zu is a diverse blending of American classics serving favorites like Beef Stroganoff, Roasted Spaghetti Squash, and Heirloom Tomato and Burrata Salad.
Zvetayeva was a Russian poetess who went into exile to Europe in the 1920s-1930s. She was full of people expection in poetry circles and was equal famous with Anna.
Zvezda has living and working quarters for astronauts and cosmonauts.
ZVEZDIN, Victor Aleksandrovich
Zvika Klier, CEO of 3DV, says the camera also will be useful for controlling avatars in online games.
Zvi Shalit, the soldier's grandfather, was interviewed on Israel Radio.
Zvjezdan Misimovic headed a good chance over and Tomasz Kuszczak made a couple of decent saves to deny Makoto Hasebe.
Zvjezdan Misimovic pulled one back with a fine free-kick curler before Brych conjured up a penalty for Wolfsburg.
ZVL black liquor filter is an improved type of micro-filter which is an equipment to recycle the fine fiber drained to the waste water during the process flow of waste paper.
z/VM (full virtualization)
z/VM is the newest VM operating system for the 64-bit z/Architecture.
z/VM provides full-virtualization with hardware assist and supports a broad range of operating systems, including Linux.
Zvonareva never looked comfortable against Li , even when she was leading 5 - 1 in the second set.
Zvonareva never looked comfortable against Li, even when she was leading 5-1 in the second set.
Zvonareva's exit from Indian Wells comes one day after she knocked out defending champion and top seed Maria Sharapova of Russia 4-6, 7-5, 6-1.
Zvone s creations. A delight!
ZVON offers an  XSL FO reference that maps out some relationships of elements but does not go into much depth on each element's semantics.
ZVON's  SVG Reference serves as a map of element relationships, with some examples.
ZVON's  XHTML 1.0 reference includes examples and links back to the standard.
ZV-Plus Digital Video Surveillance System is the new generation of digital video surveillance system, which based on TCP/IP network, using IP multicast, H. 264hardware codec technology.
ZVS conditions (developed in the paper) lead to an interesting way to control the converter, and a discrete variable frequency control is proposed.
ZVS is achieved for all switches in a wide load range with the use of the energy in the output filter inductors.
ZVS is achieved for each main switch without any auxiliary circuit. Voltage stress of each main switch is a half of input voltage.
ZVS:Of the ones not mentioned yet - magic.
ZVS or ZVZCS soft switching can be achieved in the inverter by using two kinds of control strategy. The simulation and test results showed the feasibility of the control strategies.
ZVS Phase Shifted Full Bridge Adjustable Current Stabilizer
ZVS-PWM controlled current-mode resonant converter previously propsoed includes an active-clamp circuit and a center-tap tpe synchronous rectifying circuit.
ZVT - PWM soft switching convert techniques is the newest development of converters.
Zvyozdny Gorodok is the birthplace of spaceflight.
ZW4006 type miniature bench drills is light weight, simple structure and easy for operation. It is ideal tool for homework and handcraft.
Zwai, the former ambassador to Britain, has a reputation as a pragmatist and might then be able to bring in rival groups and tribes and stitch the country back together again in a more democratic way.
Zwar schickten die USA dem bedraengten General verstaerkt Nachschub und Geld.
Zwarte Piet, or Black Peter is Santa’s helper in the Netherlands.
Z was part of both our lives.
Z-Wave is a narrow band radio frequency protocol used for wireless devices.
Z-Wave uses a Source Routing Algorithm to determine the fastest route for messages.
ZWB222 series hydraulic balance valve for finishing hydraulic balance during all offshoot loop of one system.
Z:We design it on the principle of simpleness.
Zweig has written a story in his book, Story of Chess: A prisoner felt time passing so slowly in the beginning while he felt time flying so rapidly after he got a chess book.
Zweig indirectly expressed his literary views by the comments in his essays , review, letters, and works and also the words of his characters.
Zweig is a typical West Jew, whose childhood and youth neither undergoes the frustrations nor meets the restriction on Jewish culture and religion as the other Jewish people do.
Zweig's education and the influences imposed on him have formed his own thoughts on biographic literature, which can be seen in the forewords, prefaces and other texts.
Zweihanders are very heavily armoured foot troops who can cut a bloody swathe through nearly all infantry they will encounter.
Zweihänders are very heavily armoured foot troops who can cut a bloody swathe through nearly all infantry they will encounter.
Zwei Herren im Haus, muss einer hinaus.
Zwei-Stien Video Editor : Zwei-Stein 3.01 is a freeware non-linear, non-destructive video compositing and editing system which offers many advanced features unavailable elsewhere.
Zweites Buch (Second Book) expands on the original ideas of Mein Kampf and outlines further plans for a war with the United States and the British Empire for entire world domination by Germany.
Z: Welcome to Shanghai, Mr. Grant. This a map of Shanghai and here is of Pudong.
Zwelithini, 62, condemned "rogue" virginity testers and expressed dismay at seeing pictures of the tests turn up on the internet, South Africa's Mercury newspaper reported.
Zwelithini, E 62, condemned "rogue" virginity testers and expressed dismay at seeing pictures of the tests turn up on the internet, South Africa's Mercury newspaper reported.
ZWELITHINI, Zulu King Goodwill
Z: Well, do central bank interventions and exchange controls affect rates of exchange?
Z：Well, I am the second assistant to a semi-importance-chef.
z Well, not quite because here I also had a z.
Z:Well, the first bank that was partially owned and controlled by a state government was established in Venice in 1587.
Zwell uses the example of, Joseph, an accountant for one of today's biggest accounting firms.
ZWEYGART WALTER KG offers Rolled products, Fittings and Hardware stores. Further offers are available on Construction Elements.
ZWF - 516 and ZWF - 519 showed the most remarkable activities among all the compounds.
ZWF series brushless DC motor especially for central air conditioner and air curtain is a high efficiency motor with permanent magnetic.
ZWF series brushless DC motor especially for vacuum cleaner is a high efficiency motor with permanent magnetic.
ZWG-2 wet drawing lubricant for steel cord of meridian tyre was prepared, and the choice of additives and the compounding of lubricant were studied.
Z : what is your favorite place to date a girl?
Z what is your favorite place to date a girl.
Z: Who are your favorite musicians, who inspirit you the most in music?
Z: Who are your favorite musicians, who inspirit you the most in music?
Zwick 4106 Extrusion Plastometers are the ideal solution for raw-material manufacturers and for use in research and development.
Zwicky compact galaxy
Zwicky galaxy.
Zwiers says that cutting emissions is essential, because changes in rainfall will impact many people negatively, especially in developing countries just north of the equator.
Zwingli agreed that God has the power to make a body be in different places at the same time, but he saw no Scriptural proof to indicate that this happens in the Lord's Supper.
Zwingli also appealed to Scripture in his defense, not merely to reason.
Zwingli also opposed the Anabaptists in Zurich who rejected infant baptism.
Zwingli appealed to Augustine as a supporter of his view that the sacrament is a sign and that Christ's physical, human nature cannot be omnipresent.
Zwingli argued that Luther's view denigrated the humanity of Christ by not allowing Christ's human body to remain in heaven, at the right hand of the Father.
Zwingli believed, based on logic and human reason, that a human body could not be present in more than one place;
Zwingli believed Luther had so emphasized Christ's divinity that the physical aspects of his humanity were being dismissed or worse, denied.
Zwingli continually pressed Luther on why the physical presence was necessary if the "flesh profits nothing."
Zwingli continued to use Greek, as a scholar of the humanist tradition who believed that the language mattered very much.
Zwingli could not affirm the idea of an omnipresent physical body, which is why he believed that Christ could only be spiritually present in the Lord's Supper.
Zwingli did not see the need for a "sacramental union" in the Lord's Supper because of his modified understanding of sacraments.
Zwingli in 1524 marked his new status by marrying Anna Reinhard, a widow with whom he had lived openly.
Zwingli insisted that the biblical text taught that the Lord's Supper was a sign, and that to make it something more violated the nature of the sacrament.
Zwingli quickly attracted large audiences to the cathedral by expounding the original Greek and Hebrew Scriptures chapter by chapter and book by book, beginning with the Gospel of Matthew.
Zwingli saw in Luther's view of the Lord's Supper an irrational belief that hearkened back to Roman Catholic dogma.
Zwingli's denial of the "real presence" did not result in the neglecting of the sacrament that would characterize many of his followers in centuries to come.
Zwingli's labors at Einsiedeln had prepared him for a wider field, and this he was soon to enter.
Zwingli sought to debate based on logical conclusions and reason;
Zwingli sought to debate based on logical conclusions and reason.
Zwingli's Sixty - seven Articles (1523) for disputation became a basic doctrinal document for the Swiss reformed church.
Zwingli's surroundings in childhood, and his early training, were such as to prepare him for his future mission.
Zwingli was active in extending the reform to other Swiss cities, such as Basel, Sankt Gallen, and Bern.
Zwingli was soon called from Basel to enter upon his lifework.
Z - without knowledge is a runaway horse.
Zwitterion An ion with both a positive and a negative charge. Amino acids and form zwitterions: the amino group has the form-NH3+ and the acid group is ionized as-COO-.
Zwitterion An ion with both a positive and a negative charge.
zwitterionic stationary phase.
ZWJZ products apply widely to OEM and maintenance of all the major industries including Petroleum, Chemistry, Mining, Metallurgy, Ship Making, Machinery, Paper and Pump, Ceramic and Sugar Refining.
zWLM enables many different workloads with different priorities and requirements to execute on the same hardware.
zWLM then uses these classifications to select a servant region to process the message.
Zwolle is the capital city of the province of Overijssel, Netherlands, 120 kilometers northeast of Amsterdam.
Zworykin, who had emigrated to the U. S. from Russia with a PhD in electrical engineering.
ZWQ disc paper cutting machine is used in the trades of paper-making, printing, electric cable, aluminium foil, plastics, match-making, food, etc.
ZWS demonstrates how capable an application -- in this case, an HTTP 0.9+ server -- can be even though written in just over 500 lines of well-commented zsh (!).
ZW serial self-priming and non-block sewage pump is a new structure product which is developed on base of reaping study of domestic and foreign similar technology.
ZW serial self-priming and non-block sewage pump is a new structure product which is developed on base of reaping study of domestic and foreign similar technology.
ZW Series is bound for high productivity, easy to operate wheel loaders to establish new standards …
ZW series without lubrication liquefied petroleum gas compressor has been listed as China City Gas Association recommended products.
ZWT-35 automatic paper bowl veneer machine is a multi-station automatic bowl veneer molding equipment.
ZWW Chinese and foreign net, And United Nations member states peacekeeping police, Build ZAOM Alliance.
ZWW Chinese and foreign net is QQ Shaw in the country's leading business portal-type!
ZWW Chinese and foreign net" members of the recommended products, the commodity's "owner and authenticity", ZWW Chinese and foreign net does not bear any responsibility.
ZWZ products and technical equipment in the domestic leading level.
ZWZ the first set of specifications for export to Europe of a turntable bearing hair to the user, applied to submarine cable winding machinery.
ZX12series resistor is applied to AC 50HZ, 660Vor DC voltage 440Vcircuit, main for starting, braking and controlling motor.
ZX-150B type is a kind of low-speed machine, but it adopts equivalent PLC, positioning module, servo motor and frequency converter. Besides, its touch screen is featured with a humanized operation.
ZX17 series stainless steel resistor is applied to AC 50HZ, 1140V and DC voltage 1000V circuit, main of starting, braking and controlling motor. The rated power is 5.6KW.
ZX 1 was a pleiotropic mutant isolated from Streptomyces lividans JT 46 by NTG mutagenesis.
ZX 3、 ZXG & M sery DC arc welder are the DC welder that use silicon rectifier.
ZX7 Series MOSFET Inverters Arc Welder(1) The advanced technology of inversion and MOSFET power switch semiconductor is used.
ZXE1 series AC & D. C arc welding machine is used for AC/DC MMA welding with all kinds of electrode;
ZXG 1 Series arc welding rectifier is D . C . welding power source used for manual arc welding.
Zxjfan How is there people like you who still believe that the US can stand alone in today's world?
ZX: Landscape Architects in China focus more on Landscape Design. People know much less about landscape planning, what is your opinion about the relationship between planning and design?
ZX: Poor urban environment, low rate of urban green spaces and heavy river pollution are some of the serious problems in China.
ZX series of products are the simple - type converter for family use.
ZXSS10 M100 is a research item of media gateway equipment of ZTE.
ZXTM 40 A can be operated in automotive or comtinuous - speed control with high efficient.
ZXTM40 A can be operated in automotive or comtinuous-speed control with high efficient.
Z. Xu, G. Bu," A Theorem on Grid Access Control", Journal of Computer Science&amp; Technology, vol.18, No.4, July2003, pp.515-522.
ZXUMS P100 system was previewed and accepted in the early 2004. And the system has been applied successfully in Anhui provincial-level work management.
ZXX type is similar to ZBX type sediment sucker by peripheral transmission in application. It is a new type product with some technology imported from overseas.
ZY-1Toothpick Packing Machine This machine, features double-sided and double-color printing, automatic gluing, automatic counting and regular feeding by vibrators.
z=y^2 If you look at it in the y, z plane, then it's a parabola going up,z=y^2.
“Zyama, ” Bomka said, “you should be acquainted with these people.
Zyama had expended considerable energy publicizing the fact that he had a Siberian boxing champion working his door—he would have opposed a change at the door on a night without gangsters.
Zyama had placed two leather armchairs in front of his desk, but only the smaller of the two had consented to sit.
Zyama, who had been reclining in his suède admiral’s chair, tilted forward and made a production of looking the gangster in the eye. “You think you’re the first ones to come in here?
ZY:But how can I listen carefully while taking notes?
ZYBW _ F type dry running vacuum pressure combined < ... class13'>product of ZYBW _ E type pump.
ZYBW _ F type dry running vacuum pressure combinedderivative product of ZYBW _ E type pump.
... '>ZYBW _ F type dry running vacuum pressure combined pump is the derivative product of ZYBW _ E type pump.
ZYBW _ F type dry running vacuum pressure combined < ... '>pump is the derivative product of ZYBW _ E type pump.
ZYBW_F type dry running vacuum pressure combined pump is the derivative product of ZYBW_E type pump.
ZYBW _ F type dry running vacuum pressure combined pump is the derivative product of ZYBW _ E type
ZYBW _ F type dry running vacuum pressure combined pump is the derivative product of
ZYBW _ F type dry running vacuum pressure combined pump is the derivative
ZYBW _ F type dry running vacuum pressure combined pump is the
ZYBW _ F type dry running vacuum pressure combined pump ZYBW _ E type pump.
ZY can effectively communicate with our engineers and has established sound collaboration relationship with them. He can also help us propose feasible design plan on production.
ZY:Can I go out on a story immediately?
ZY: Can I go out on a story immediately?
ZYC cone crushers can be widely used in metal and nonmetal mines, cement, construction, sand and metallurgical industries.
Zydrunas Ilgauskas and Larry Hughes had 16 points apiece for the Cavs.
Z：Yeah, but lots of people say they'll never do things
Z: Yeah. Lots of famous universities in the world have their own Christ church, such as Oxford.
Z:Yes, they did, but these laws were gradually changed during the 14th and 15th centuries and banking functions started appearing again in Italy and Belgium and later in France
ZYFF can inhibit auricular swelling caused by xylene in mice and remarkably reduce the phlogistic exudation of granuloma induced by croton oil in rats.
Zygapophysial joint syndrome is one of the causes of chronic cervical and low back pain.
zyglo inspection
zyglo penetrant method
Zygocactus truncatus [crab cactus]
Zygomatic branch of lacrimal artery.
zygomatic complex fracture
zygomatic head of quatratus labii superioris muscle
zygomaticobuccal fibrofatty pad
Zygomaticomaxillary complex fractures
Zygomycete Any fungus belonging to the phylum Zygomycota.
Zygomycete Any fungus belonging to the phylum Zygomycota.
Zygomycetes resemble the other two classes in this group but have nonmotile spores.
Zygophyllaceae species.
Zygophyllum xanthaxylum (Bunge) Maxim. is an important component of desert flora with important ecological value.
Zygosaccharomyces Rouxii and Candida play an important role in the fermentation of soybean paste.
Zygosity in all same-sex and same-blood-group twin pairs was determined by 16 polymorphic markers.
Zygospore A resistant sexual spore formed when a zygote develops a thick wall.
Zygote at the dormancy stage had a small nucleolus and marked decrease in ribosomes, as shown by a few polysomes, which suggests decreased metabolism.
Zygote grading
Zygote, in which the male and female nucleoli not fused yet, and primary endosperm nucleus already divided;
Zygote meiosis can be observed with fresh-water algae Chlamydomonas, Spirogyra , Chara for assistant materials.
Zygotene is characterized by the active and specific pairing( synapsis ) of homologous chromosomes leading to the formation of a haploid number of bivalents.
Zygotes are also tested to make sure they are free of the original genetic disease.
Zygotes in the prophase of mitosis and two-celled proembryo became active again in metabolism, for a prominent nucleolus, high density of ribosomes and increased number of polysomes in the cytoplasm.
Zygote The diploid cell resulting from the fusion of two haploid gametes. A zygote usually undergoes mitosis immediately. See sexual reproduction.
Zygotic embryo is better than vegetative materials when used for explants.
zygotic sterility.
ZY International Limited is a professional supplier of automobile lighting and accessory and Mobile Repeaters with both product development and manufacturing capability.
ZYKOV, Andrey S.
ZY-led series of electrical products sector with the implementation of the compact, attractive appearance, intelligent control, performance, quality, ease of use and other characteristics.
Zylicz quit his hospital post to dedicate himself to an alternative.
Zylka and his colleagues are now searching for additional proteins that degrade nucleotides in these neurons.
ZYLON. Compared with other fibers , flexible, lightweight and strength advantage.
Zymogen granule in hepatopancreas decreased.
zymogen (orproenzyme) Any of a class of proteins that are secreted by cells and are inactive precursors of enzymes.
Zymogon granules were greatly decreased in number.
Zymolysis Engineering
Zymomonas integrant possess the ability to ferment pentose into ethanol.
Zymosis soybean meal.
Zymotechnics has greater development potential in the application of seaweed processing.
zymotic fluid of Cordyceps mycelium
Zynga allegedly authorized an ad agency to plant fake $25, 000 bills on the sidewalks of the city on its behalf.
Zynga allegedly authorized an ad agency to plant fake $25,000 bills on the sidewalks of the city on its behalf.
Zynga also disclosed how reliant it is on its most-popular games, though the reliance is lessening over time.
Zynga also disclosed two other new pieces of info
Zynga and Facebook’s joint statement: “Facebook and Zynga have transitioned Facebook Credits to be the exclusive method of payment for most Zynga network games on the Facebook platform.
Zynga and Google declined to comment or confirm a Google investment.
Zynga and Walt Disney, among others, are reportedly courting the game maker, whose profits soared to nearly $140 million from its plush toys, cookbooks, baby clothes and even costumes.
Zynga can then use that information to figure out tactics to get people to invite friends to play its games, something a company with mostly anonymous players can't do.
Zynga City, as the new build-your-own-town game will be called, will be played through the Chinese Internet portal Tencent.
Zynga co-founder and Chief Executive Mark Pincus, 45 years old, has used the measurability of Facebook activity to shape games in a way that hasn't been possible in the past.
Zynga conducts hundreds of 'A-B tests' within its games, in which two sets of players see virtual goods on sale with, say, subtle color differences to see which color sells better.
"Zynga did resort to questionable methods," Hargil said. "They were using those very successfully to become a profitable company before they raised a single venture capital dollar."
Zynga executives respond that they design games to attract a broad audience, not just hard-core gamers that form the backbone of the traditional games business.
Zynga first entered China in 2010 when it bought XPD Media, a social game developer in Beijing.
Zynga, founded in 2007, has filed for an initial offering that could value it at $20 billion -- close to the combined market capitalization of Activision and EA.
Zynga founder and CEO Mark Pincus is the company's top shareholder, with a 16% position.
Zynga had effectively been blocked from China because its games are played through Facebook, which is banned in the country.
Zynga had expressed dissatisfaction with the terms Facebook enforced on the company, and were reported looking around for alternative platforms.
Zynga has adopted the online-gaming model prevalent in Asia, where games are free and users pay only for optional in-game extras. The firm has had a positive cashflow since September 2007.
Zynga has been the target of lawsuits by rivals alleging the company copied their games, and Zynga has initiated similar lawsuits itself.
Zynga has been valued at more than $4.5 billion, putting Mr. Pincus, who has retained voting control over the company, on a path to become Silicon Valley’s next billionaire.
Zynga has one big advantage: Because its creatures exist only on a computer, it's much easier for Zynga to keep coming up with new ones.
Zynga has raised millions of dollars in recent years through similar campaigns, most notably for the relief efforts in Haiti.
Zynga has since pulled the ads, and Mr. Pincus now says he was misunderstood.
Zynga hired away Electronic Arts VP Jeff Karp, who will serveat the social gaming startup as Chief Marketing and Revenue Officer. (TechCrunch)
'Zynga is a close partner and a great example of a developer that has built games that millions of people play with their friends every day on Facebook, ' a Facebook spokesman said.
Zynga is expected to file soon for an initial public offering (IPO).
Zynga is going whale hunting in China.
Zynga is one of the biggest web tech companies in the world right now.
Zynga is one of the fall's most highly-anticipated IPOs, with plans to raise $1 billion.
Zynga is transforming the game industry.
Zynga makes money, by and large, only when a small fraction of its users pay real money for make-believe “virtual” goods that let them move up in the games or to give their friends gifts.
Zynga reports $90 million of net income in 2010 on around $597 million in revenue.
Zynga reports it has nearly $1 billion in the bank as of March 31, which is a couple hundred million more than it had at year-end 2010.
Zynga said it determined the company had a “material weakness in internal control over financial reporting” as of March 31, 2011.
Zynga said the game would be on Tencent's open platform.
Zynga’s empire is made up of cartoonish online games that even Mr. Pincus acknowledges are goofy.
Zynga's first-quarter revenues grew to $235 million this year, more than double revenues from a year earlier.
Zynga's IPO is listed as "delayed" on Yahoo Finance while standing at 75 days.
Zynga's revenues for the first half of 2010 will be a stunning $350 million, half of which is operating profit.
Zynga, the company that makes Farmville, is counting on human nature to keep its businesses growing, says Jeff Chester, a consumer privacy advocate.
Zynga, the market leader, which had 22m users in January, now has more than 170m.
Zynga, the world's largest social gaming company, hopes to raise $2 million for Save the Children's Japan Earthquake Tsunami Emergency Fund.
Zynga was founded in 2007 by Mr. Pincus, occupying a former potato-chip factory he owned in an industrial neighborhood in San Francisco.
Zynga, which filed with regulators in the United States on July 1 for an initial public offering of up to $1 billion, is hoping to attract millions of users to its new game.
Zynga, which is said to be contemplating a public offering, clearly does not want to have all its eggs in the Facebook basket.
Zynga will release an early version of a game called Zynga City on Tencents' open platform, Zynga said in a statement on Monday.
Zynk apparently provides for most (if not all) of the rsync options.
z You pick any two components, say the x and the z component, and you take the partial of the x component with respect to z, fz and you must make them equal. And the same with every pair of variables.
Zyprexa is Eli Lilly’s top selling drug.
Zyprexa was introduced in September 1996 and hailed as a breakthrough medicine for the treatment of schizophrenia.
ZYQI type super-strong paraffin inhibiting and antiscaling viscosity reducing device has incorporated with vortex, fluidic and sonic-wave technologies.
Zyrtec is widely prescribed in China to treat allergy patients.
ZY series vibrated filter is one of precised powder griddle,low noise ,high efficiency,need only 3~5 minutes to rapidly replace the griddle,all closed structure.Used to filter particles,powder and mucilage.
ZY series vibreted griddle: use upright motor as the source of vibration, equipped eccentricity hammer on the both sides of the top and the bottom, change circumrotate to level, upright and slope movement, then pass these three movement to the surface of the griddle.
Zytech engineering , llc has developed and tested a safe room . .
ZY:Thank you. Not only am I interested in photography.
ZYTO develops cutting edge technology that uses principles from Information Theory and Quantum Physics.
Zyuganov has run for president in the 1996,2000,2008, but were lost to Boris Yeltsin, Putin and Medvedev.
Zyuganov may be able to pick up votes from some young people with no memory of the Soviet era.
Zyuganov said Yeltsin had let his friend Bill kick him in the rear.
Zyuganov talks of spending more to protect the environment and is careful to underline that his party respects democracy, human rights and freedom of speech.
Zyvex, a company started by a software magnate enticed by Drexierian nanotechnology, has recognized how difficult it will be to create robots at the nanometer scale;
ZY: Why is listening so important?
ZY:Why is listening so important?
ZY:Wonderful. What do I need take with me I already have a notebook and camera.
ZY: Wow! That was a real "scoop".
ZYX is trading above the breakeven point.
Zyzomys pedunculatus [thick-tailed rat]
ZZ and I are lying in bed talking about it.
ZZ-bit monochrome
ZZ contained an unexpected object.
ZZ contained an unexpected object.
ZZ contains an invalid path.
ZZ contains an invalid path.
ZZ could not be created because the directory is full.
ZZ could not be created because the directory is full.
ZZ could not be removed because it is the current directory.
ZZ could not be removed because it is the current directory .
ZZ could not be removed because it is the current directory.
Z-zeal, is your library staff exciting about the possibilities that social networking can offer your library?
Z - zeal, is your library staff exciting about the possibilities that social networking can offer your library?
Z Zeal without knowledge is a runaway horse.
Z- Zeal without knowledge is the sister of folly.
Z- Zero in on the truth by analyzing situations from every possible angle.
ZZF:I bought some flowers for my mother. I cooked a big meal for my mother. I told my mother, "I love you."
ZZ Has been deleted from the global header list. Would you like to add it back for future use with old and new filters.
ZZ: Here we have the tale about fossil culture written by a person called MR. XX.
Zz. if you want to stay on this case.
Z . Zip through boring work at the beginning of the day.
Z. Zip through boring work at the beginning of the day.
ZZ: I remember Ang Lee had audition for like couple months, and I was, I think I heard someone called me and said Ang Lee is doing audition why you don't send some pictures?
ZZ is exhausted, even a game from his favorite soccer team can not keep him awake. Poor Baby!
ZZ is not a valid destination folder name. Folder names cannot contain backslashes.
ZZ is not a valid destination folder name. Folder names cannot contain backslashes.
ZZ: I think because our culture, we have such a long history and we have a lot of details in our costume.
ZZLS is a kind of green ecological material with high strength and great erosion resistance.
ZZLS material is a kind of ecotype revetment material with the functions of higher strength and anti-erosion, and recoverable vegetation.
ZZM-A drill grinder simple structure, easy operation. One setup to complete grindings on drill web and chisel edge.
ZZM - A drill grinder simple structure , easy setup to complete grindings on drill web and chisel edge.
ZZMS recruits foreign teachers from English-speaking countries, in the past several years, there have been more than 30 teachers from America, Canada, Holland, Australia teaching in ZZMS.
ZZ: My only goal was, don't let him down.
ZZ:No. it just, you know I think its normal for director to see different actors, actresses.
Zzoma is a device which is worn around the chest area like a belt, with a device on the back, which is a firm, foam material wrapped in canvas to keep them from moving on their backs.
Z: Zooerastia: Term used to describe sexual arousal from stroking and caressing animals.
Z zoom factor The zoom factor for a graphics device map.
ZZS6000/17/37A four pillars chock-shield is fully-mechanized support equipment that is designed for high output and efficiency mine.
ZZ set the alarm for3:45 am, but we were both so tired, we finally didn't get up to see the games.
z z So the charge is actually just equal to z, +2e we can write plus 2, or you can write plus 2 e, e he charge on an electron.
ZZS series shake frame flat screen apply to removing section and coarse select ofmechanical wood pulp,sulphate wood pulp,straw pulp and wasted paper,etc,during the procedure of make thick liquid extensively.
ZZ This file already exists. Replace existing file?
ZZ This file already exists. Replace existing file?
ZZ Top has been together for four decades, was inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame, and was ranked number 44 on VH1 cable's "100 Greatest Artists of Hard Rock."
ZZ: Um, I started being confidant, and I started thinking I can act.
ZZ was comforting me, discussing the performance she'd just seen, her first and only.
ZZ was not found.
ZZ: Ya I feel much you know, I can play with my role.
ZZ: Ya, I still have the dream.
zzz is the country code.
Zz:Zoe the zebra zigzags in the zoo.
ZZZZ means “sleepy or tired or bored”; A/S/L is tricky, which is often used at first encounter. It's a three words question: “ age/sex/location?
Zzzzs...the second one twenty seconds later.
Zzzzzzz. A helpful turtle arm proves the perfect pillow for an exhausted hippo.
ZZZZZZZZZZZZZZ. The novel reminded me of the "cultural revolution".
α began to trot between the bookshelves,looking around anxiously.
α Crystallin acts as a molecular chaperone to protect esterase against inactivation.
α_ H-crystallin protected inactivation of catalase by fructose and heat stress.
... '>α - tocopheryl succinate ( α - TOS ) on S 180 sarcoma and immune functions in tumor - bearing
α, β-Bis (β-chloroethoxy) ethane was treated with sodium iodide, thenreacted with the appropriate 1-substituted piperazine and sodium bicarbonateto form 1, 2-bis (1'-carbethoxy-4'-piperazylethoxy)ethane and 1, 2-bis (1'-diethylcarbamyl-4'-piperazylethoxy) ethane respectively.
β-actin changes during hair cell regeneration in the chick basilar papilla
β-cell is defferent of others, its heterogy is higher than other cells, that is to say, mtDNA mutation aggregated inβ-cell andβ-cell should be apt to mutate.
δ Assay of Plastic-adherent Cells for Evaluating Bone Marrow Primitive Progenitor
ΔNp63 protein was found to be closely associated with cell malignant hyperplasia.
π On thismodel, resources would be allocated by negotiations between producers,consumers, environmentalists and other relevant parties, in networks ofworkplace, neighbourhood and consumer councils.
Φ209 Dunhuang work is an unfinished work which has confirmed to be an incomplete copy of Records of the West by Yi Jing the Monk. A study of this copy has enabled us to see the original appearance of this work.
... > ψ m in RGC apoptosis has certain pragmatic value , especially on quantitative analysis.
...
... �
... '>、
... 、
Φ209    Dunhuang work is an unfinished work which has confirmed to be an incomplete copy of Records of the West by Yi Jing the Monk. A study of this copy has enabled us to see the original appearance of this work.
Φ209 Dunhuang work is an unfinished work which has confirmed to be an incomplete copy of Records of the West by Yi Jing the Monk. A study of this copy has enabled us to see the original appearance of this work.
